Utah statutes.
7-1-807.   Printed checks, drafts and orders -- Requirements -- Violation as
misdemeanor.
Every check, draft, order, or other like instrument printed for a customer of
any institution issuing transaction accounts in the state as part of a series
after the effective date of this act shall have on its face the name and
address of the account holder, the month and year the account was opened, and
the number of the check, draft, order, or other like instrument in unbroken,
sequential, numerical order, beginning with the number 101, except for initial
deposits to open a new account or in case of lost or stolen checks when a
limited supply of unnumbered counterchecks may be issued. Any person who
violates this section is guilty of a class C misdemeanor.
